Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2346.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3502(c) and 3701(a) and (b)(14) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3502. Equitable division of marital property.* * *(c) Family home.--[The] Except as provided in subsection (g)(2), the court may award, during the pendency of the action or otherwise, to one or both of the parties the right to reside in the marital residence.* * *(g) Conviction.--A party who has been convicted of committing a personal injury crime against the other party may not:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) Be awarded a percentage of marital assets, unless the court finds that the equitable distribution of marital assets is necessary to prevent manifest injustice.(2) During the pendency of the action or otherwise, be awarded the right to reside in the marital residence, unless the court finds such an order is necessary to prevent manifest injustice.§ 3701. Alimony.(a) General rule.--[Where] Subject to subsection (a.1), where a divorce decree has been entered, the court may allow alimony, as it deems reasonable, to either party only if it finds that alimony is necessary.(a.1) Conviction.--Except where the court finds that an order awarding alimony is necessary to prevent manifest injustice, a party who has been convicted of committing a personal injury crime against the other party may not be awarded alimony. Any amount of alimony paid by the injured party after the commission of the offense but before conviction of the other party shall be recoverable by the injured party upon petition.(b) Factors relevant.--In determining whether alimony is necessary and in determining the nature, amount, duration and manner of payment of alimony, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:* * *(14) [The] Subject to subsection (a.1), the marital misconduct of either of the parties during the marriage. The marital misconduct of either of the parties from the date of final separation shall not be considered by the court in its determinations relative to alimony, except that the court shall consider the abuse of one party by the other party. As 20260HB2346PN3119 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 used in this paragraph, "abuse" shall have the meaning given to it under section 6102 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2346PN3119 - 3 - 1234